Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.150

Misuse, alteration of registration database.

Any state or local election officer, or a designee, who has access to any county or statewide voter registration database who knowingly uses or alters information in the database inconsistent with the performance of his or her duties is guilty of a class C felony, punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 2004 c 267 s 138.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.